Massachusetts, session 194th, H2243.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13 of Chapter 4 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof
the following subsection:-
If a person, corporation, state agency, including its political subdivisions, a state
authority, including its political subdivisions, municipality, including its political subdivisions, or
other legal entity is required by a statute, ordinance, by-law or judicial order to publish a legal
notice in a newspaper or newspaper of general circulation, the person, corporation, agency,
authority, municipality or other legal entity may satisfy such requirement by one or more of the
following means:
A. a print newspaper of local or general circulation;
B. a newspaper’s website, including on-line only newspaper publications;
of 2

C. a statewide website that may be maintained as a repository for such notices; or
D. a city or town-wide website that may be maintained as a repository for such notices;
SECTION 2. Subsection (d) of said section 13 of said chapter 4, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- An error in a legal notice published on a
newspaper's website, statewide website, or city or town-wide website that is the result of (1) an
error of the website operator; or (2) a temporary website outage or service interruption that
prevents the publication or display of a legal notice on the website, shall not constitute a defect in
publication of the legal notice; provided, however, that the legal notice appears correctly on
either the newspaper's website, the statewide website, or city or town-wide website and satisfies
all other legal notice requirements.
SECTION 3. Section 11 of Chapter 40A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting the following sentence at the end of the first paragraph:-
A city or town may permit that all notices of public hearings be published: (i) in a local
newspaper, either in electronic or paper format; or (ii) on the official city or town-wide website
to satisfy this section.
of 2